test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_caaci_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čääci: # ok
    čääci+N+Sg+Nom:   čääci
    čääci+N+Sg+Gen:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Acc:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Ill:   čáácán
    čääci+N+Sg+Loc:   čääsist
    čääci+N+Sg+Com:   čassijn
    čääci+N+Sg+Abe:   čäsittáá
    čääci+N+Ess:      čääccin
    čääci+N+Par:      čääccid
    čääci+N+Pl+Nom:   čääsih
    čääci+N+Pl+Gen:  [čaasij, časij]
    čääci+N+Pl+Acc:   čaasijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Ill:   čassijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Loc:   čaasijn
    čääci+N+Pl+Com:   [časijguin, časijgijn]
    čääci+N+Pl+Abe:   časijttáá

  Noun - čeeci: # ok
    čeeci+N+Sg+Nom:   čeeci
    čeeci+N+Sg+Gen:   čeesi
    čeeci+N+Sg+Acc:   čeesi
    čeeci+N+Sg+Ill:   čiäcán
    čeeci+N+Sg+Loc:  čeesist
    čeeci+N+Sg+Com:   čessijn
    čeeci+N+Sg+Abe:   česittáá
    čeeci+N+Ess:      čeeccin
    čeeci+N+Par:      čeeccid
    čeeci+N+Pl+Nom:   čeesih
    čeeci+N+Pl+Gen:  [čeesij, česij]
    čeeci+N+Pl+Acc:   čeesijd
    čeeci+N+Pl+Ill:   čessijd
    čeeci+N+Pl+Loc:   čeesijn
    čeeci+N+Pl+Com:   [česijguin, česijgijn]
    čeeci+N+Pl+Abe:   česijttáá
           
  Noun - čielgi: # ok 
    čielgi+N+Sg+Nom:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Gen:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Acc:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Ill:   čiälgán
    čielgi+N+Sg+Loc:   čielgist
    čielgi+N+Sg+Com:   čielgijn
    čielgi+N+Sg+Abe:   čielgittáá
    čielgi+N+Ess:      čielgin
    čielgi+N+Par:      čielgid
    čielgi+N+Pl+Nom:   čielgih
    čielgi+N+Pl+Gen:  čielgij
    čielgi+N+Pl+Acc:   čielgijd
    čielgi+N+Pl+Ill:   čielgijd # checked with Ilmari Mattus, short diphtong, must be written with 
    čielgi+N+Pl+Loc:   čielgijn
    čielgi+N+Pl+Com:   [čielgijguin, čielgijgijn]
    čielgi+N+Pl+Abe:   čielgijttáá

  Noun - eeči: # ok
    eeči+N+Sg+Nom:   eeči
    eeči+N+Sg+Gen:   eeji
    eeči+N+Sg+Acc:   eeji
    eeči+N+Sg+Ill:   iäčán
    eeči+N+Sg+Loc:   eejist
    eeči+N+Sg+Com:   eijijn
    eeči+N+Sg+Abe:   ejittáá
    eeči+N+Ess:      eeččin
    eeči+N+Par:      eeččid
    eeči+N+Pl+Nom:   eejih
    eeči+N+Pl+Gen:  [eejij, ejij]
    eeči+N+Pl+Acc:   eejijd
    eeči+N+Pl+Ill:   eijijd
    eeči+N+Pl+Loc:   eejijn
    eeči+N+Pl+Com:   [ejijguin, ejijgijn]
    eeči+N+Pl+Abe:   ejijttáá
